District of Columbia statutes.
8-113.04

Interim prohibition for installation.

From March 8, 1991, until the effective date of the rules issued pursuant to § 8-113.12 regarding performance standards for new underground storage tanks, no person may install an underground storage tank to store a regulated substance unless the tank, whether of single or double wall construction, complies with the District of Columbia Fire Prevention Code and the new tank performance standards set forth in 40 C.F.R. part 280 .

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-242, § 5, 38 DCR 344
This section is referenced in § 8-113.09.
1981 Ed., § 6-995.4.